Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 5 COUNTY PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT ACT
30-20-522. Board can issue bonds - form - legislative declaration.

To carry out the purposes of this part 5, the board is hereby authorized to issue bonds of the district. Such bonds shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, payable at such times as determined by the board, and shall be due and payable in installments at such times as determined by the board and extending not more than twenty years from date of issuance. The form and terms of said bonds, including provisions for their sale, payment, and redemption, shall be determined by the board. To the extent required by section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, such bonds shall not be issued unless first approved at an election held for that purpose in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. If the board so determines, such bonds may be redeemable prior to maturity, with or without payment of a premium, but no premium shall exceed three percent of the principal thereof. The bonds shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and signed by the presiding officer of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the board. Such bonds shall be in such denominations as the board shall determine. Interest coupons, if any, shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the presiding officer of the board. Under no circumstances shall any of said bonds be considered or held to be an indebtedness, obligation, or liability of the counties or municipalities in which the district or any portion thereof is located, and bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 5 shall contain a statement to that effect.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

In performing its duties under section 20 of article X and section 6 of article XI of the Colorado constitution, the general assembly must balance the interests of controlling public debt, preserving local control, and reasonably restraining most of the growth of government;

In balancing these constitutional interests through the exercise of its legislative authority, the general assembly has enacted limitations on the ability of county public improvement districts to incur indebtedness;

A statutory restriction has been imposed on the amount of bonded indebtedness that county public improvement districts can incur with voter approval;

From time to time, changes to such limitations imposed on county public improvement districts are necessary in order to keep these constitutional interests properly balanced in light of changing circumstances;

Section 20 (1) of article X of the Colorado constitution prohibits the weakening of "other limits on district revenue, spending, and debt" without future voter approval;

No change in county public improvement district debt occurs by virtue of statutory changes that increase a limit when the debt would not actually increase without such district voter approval;

Any actual weakening of county public improvement district debt limitation occurs only when such district voter approval is obtained under an increased limit; and

By requiring voters to give approval at the county public improvement district level for any weakening of a county public improvement district limit on debt, the voter approval requirement of section 20 (1) of article X of the Colorado constitution is satisfied in a manner achieving a reasonable result through legislative harmonization of constitutional provisions.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 168, § 21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-21.

L. 70:

p. 143, § 14.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 512, § 9, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-521 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-523. Submission of debt question - form. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 68:

p. 169, § 22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-22.

L. 70:

p. 143, § 15.

L. 71:

p. 337, § 7.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-522 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-524. Notice of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 68:

p. 169, § 23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-23.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-523 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-525. Conduct of election - canvass. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 68:

p. 169, § 24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-24.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-524 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-526. Effect - subsequent elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 68:

p. 169, § 25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-25.

L. 70:

p. 144, § 16.

L. 71:

p. 337, § 3.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-525 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-527. Procedure.

Any district organized pursuant to this part 5 may be dissolved after notice given and a hearing held in the manner prescribed by sections 30-20-507 and 30-20-508. After hearing any protests against, or objections to, dissolution, if the board determines that it is in the best interests of all concerned to dissolve the district, it shall so provide by resolution, a certified copy of which shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder in the county in which the district is located. Upon such filing, the dissolution shall be complete. However, no district shall be dissolved until it has satisfied or paid in full all of its outstanding indebtedness, obligations, and liabilities, or until funds are on deposit and available therefor.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 170, § 26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-26.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-526 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-528. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case where a notice is provided for in this part 5, if the governing body finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the governing body shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but the governing body in that case shall order due notice given, and shall continue the proceeding until such time as notice shall be properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 170, § 27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-527 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-529. Early hearings.

All actions in which there may arise a question of the validity of the organization of a district, or a question of the validity of any proceeding under this part 5, shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern, and shall be heard at the earliest practicable moment.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 170, § 28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-28.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-528 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-530. County jurisdiction unimpaired.

Nothing in this part 5 shall affect or impair the control and jurisdiction which a county has over all property within its boundaries. All powers granted by this part 5 shall be subject to such control and jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 170, § 29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-29.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-529 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-531. Method not exclusive.

No part of this part 5 shall repeal or affect any other law or any part thereof, it being intended that this part 5 shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objects, and not an exclusive one.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 170, § 30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-30.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-530 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-532. Confirmation of board actions and powers.

In its discretion, the board may file a petition at any time in the district court in any county in which the district or a portion thereof is located for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred, any securities issued by the district or authorized to be issued by the district, any taxes, assessments, or service charges levied or otherwise made by the district or contracted to be levied by the district or otherwise made by the district, or of any other act, proceeding, or contract of the district whether or not such act, proceeding, or contract has been taken or executed, including proposed contracts for any improvement, proposed securities of the district to defray in whole or in part the cost of the project, the proposed acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, operation, or disposal of any property pertaining thereto, or any combination thereof.

A petition filed under subsection (1) of this section shall set forth the facts upon which the validity of such power, securities, taxes, assessments, charges, act, proceeding, or contract is founded. The presiding officer of the district shall verify the petition before it is filed with the district court by signing said petition.

Any action filed under this section shall be in the nature of a proceeding in rem. The district court shall have jurisdiction over all parties interested in the proceeding upon the publication and posting of a notice in accordance with this part 5.

The clerk of the district court in which a petition is filed shall provide notice of such filing. The notice shall include: A brief outline of the contents of the petition; the time, date, and location of the hearing; and the location where a complete copy of any documents at issue in the petition may be examined. The clerk shall serve the notice by:

Publishing the notice at least once a week for five consecutive weeks by five weekly insertions in a newspaper of general circulation in the counties and municipalities in which the district is located; and

Posting the notice in the office of the district at least thirty days prior to the date of the hearing on the petition.

Any owner of property within the boundaries of the district or any other person interested in the petition filed by the board may appear at the hearing by either filing a motion to dismiss or an answer to the petition at least five days prior to the hearing date or within such time as the court may allow. The petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who fail to appear.

The petition and notice shall be sufficient to give the district court jurisdiction, and, upon hearing, the district court shall examine and determine all matters affecting the question submitted, shall make such findings with reference thereto, and shall render such judgment and decree thereon as the case warrants.

Unless otherwise specified in this part 5, the Colorado rules of civil procedure shall govern any actions filed under this section in matters of pleading and practice.

Costs may be divided or apportioned among any contesting parties in the discretion of the district court.

Review of the judgment of the district court may be had as in other similar cases; except that such review shall be applied for within thirty days after the time of the rendition of such judgment or within such additional time as may be allowed by the court within thirty days.

The district court shall disregard any error, irregularity, or omission that does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

All cases in which there may arise a question of validity of any matter provided for under this section shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and shall be heard at the earliest practicable moment.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 513, § 10, effective April 30.

30-20-533. Exemption from taxation.

The income or other revenues of the district, any property owned by the district, any bonds issued by the district, and the transfer of and any income from any bonds issued by the district shall be exempt from all taxation and assessments by the state. In the resolution authorizing the bonds, the district may waive the exemption from federal income taxation for any interest on the bonds.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 513, § 10, effective April 30.

30-20-534. Limitation of actions.

Any legal or equitable action brought with respect to any acts or proceedings of the district, the creation of a district, the authorization of any bonds, or any other action taken under this part 5 shall commence within thirty days after the performance of such action or else shall be thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 513, § 10, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 268, § 5, effective August 7.